Utah statutes.
23-20-29.   Interference with hunting prohibited -- Action to recover
damages -- Exceptions.
(1)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who intentionally interferes
with the right of a person licensed and legally hunting under Title 23,
Chapter 19, to take wildlife by driving, harassing, or intentionally
disturbing any species of wildlife for the purpose of disrupting a legal hunt,
trapping, or predator control.
(2)  Any directly affected person or the state may bring an action to recover
civil damages resulting from a violation of Subsection (1) or a restraining
order to prevent a potential violation of Subsection (1).
(3)  This section does not apply to incidental interference with a hunt caused
by lawful activities including, but not limited to, ranching, mining, and
recreation.
